Hawaii statutes.
§806-22 Joinder of charges against
defendant. When there are several charges against any person for the same
act or transaction, or for two or more acts or transactions connected together,
or for two or more acts or transactions of the same class of crimes or
offenses, which may be properly joined, instead of having several indictments,
informations, or complaints, the whole may be joined in separate counts in one
indictment, information, or complaint. If two or more indictments,
informations, or complaints are found or entered in such cases, the court or
district judge may order them to be consolidated. [L 1941, c 59, §1; RL 1945,
§10799; RL 1955, §258-9; HRS §711-22; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1]

Case Notes

Statute construed to apply to complaint filed in circuit
court upon general appeal from district court. 37 H. 591 (1947).

See 36 H. 550 (1943), aff'd 150 F.2d 545 (1945).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next